test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - hlgihl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IHL_STEM_1

     hlgihl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl
     hlgihl+V+RELATIVE: hlgihls
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihläsáa
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihläs
     hlgihl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihläsáang
     hlgihl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihläsga
     hlgihl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihläsáas
     hlgihl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihläsáa.ang
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'úuj
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'úujang
     hlgihl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihläsáa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'us
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ujáa
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'úujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihläsáa'us
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihläsáa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihläséehl
     hlgihl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'úu
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'wägán
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áawaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'áawaan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hlgihl'wáas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'áawaas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'wáa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'áawaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägíinii
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägáangaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägáangaan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'wáaäsaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'wáaäs
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáaäsaang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáaäsga
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáaäsaas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'wáaäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa'uuj
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'wáaäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa'us
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'wáa'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wáa'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáaäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'wáa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'wáa'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'wáa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áawaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'áawaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'wáa'ahl
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'wáaäseehl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ángga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'ánggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'áangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: hlgihl'áns
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'áangaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'angáng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'áangaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ánggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ánggaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ánggaangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'ángäsaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'ángäs
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ángäsaang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ángäsga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ángäsaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'ángäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'uuj
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'ángäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áng'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ángäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'áang'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'áang'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áang'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'ángäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'áang'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áangaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'áangaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'áang'ahl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'ángäseehl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'áng'uu
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'áng'wägan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áng'aawaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'áng'aawaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hlgihl'áng'waas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'áng'aawaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'áng'waa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'áng'aawaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'wägiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'wägaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'wägaangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'áng'waaäs
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa'uuj
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áng'waa'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'áng'waa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'áng'waa'ahl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'áng'waaäseehl
